Wisconsin, session 2025, SB518.
do enact as follows:SB518,11Section 1. 5.25 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB518,2,1525.25 (4) (a) Each polling place shall be accessible to all individuals with 3disabilities. The commission shall ensure that the voting system used at each 4polling place will permit all individuals with disabilities to vote without the need 5for assistance and with the same degree of privacy that is accorded to nondisabled 6electors voting at the same polling place. The commission shall establish an 7election day accessibility checklist for assessing whether a polling place presents 8any limitations that may prevent individuals with disabilities from voting. On 9election day, one election official at each polling place shall use the election day 10accessibility checklist to assess the polling place and shall immediately notify the 11chief inspector or municipal clerk of any such limitations. The commission shall 12establish the election day accessibility checklist before the 2027 spring election and 13periodically update the checklist no later than 12 months following the release of 14the report under par. (d). This paragraph does not apply to any individual who is 15disqualified from voting under s. 6.03 (1) (a).SB518,216Section 2. 5.25 (4) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB518,3,5175.25 (4) (d) No later than June 30 of each odd-numbered year, the commission 1shall submit a report on impediments to voting faced by the elderly and 2handicapped individuals with disabilities to the appropriate standing committees 3of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3). In preparing its report under this paragraph, 4the commission shall consult with appropriate advocacy groups representing the 5elderly and handicapped populations individuals with disabilities.SB518,36Section 3. 6.82 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB518,3,1176.82 (1) (c) The commission shall provide uniform instructions for the content 8and placement of signs notifying eligible electors with disabilities that they may 9receive a ballot and voting assistance at the polling place entrance, as provided 10under par. (a). The commission shall publish the uniform instructions before the 112027 spring election.SB518,3,1212